Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BONUS FOR ELIGIBLE SERVICE MEMBERS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $6,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for purposes of providing a $1,200 bonus to service members who did not receive a bonus under Minnesota Statutes, section 197.79, but whose form DD214 confirms a qualifying service or campaign under Minnesota Statutes, section 197.79, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (2). Eligible service members must submit documentation to the commissioner of veterans affairs by December 31, 2028. This appropriation is available until June 20, 2029. new text end